California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) No member of the commission may communicate ex parte, directly or indirectly, with any applicant, or any agent, representative, or person acting on behalf of an applicant, upon the merits of an application for a license, permit, registration, or approval while the application is being investigated by the department or pending disposition before the department or the commission.

(b) No applicant, or any agent, representative, or person acting on behalf of an applicant, and no person who has a direct or indirect interest in the outcome of a proceeding to consider an application for a license, permit, registration, or approval may communicate ex
 parte, directly or indirectly, with any member of the commission, upon the merits of the application while the application is being investigated by the department or pending disposition before the department.

(c) No employee or agent of the department, applicant, or any agent, representative, or person acting on behalf of an applicant, and no person who has a direct or indirect interest in the outcome of a proceeding to consider an application for a license, permit, registration, or approval may communicate ex parte, directly or indirectly, with any member of the commission, upon the merits of the application, while the application is pending disposition before the commission.

(d) The receipt by a member of the commission of an ex parte communication prohibited by this section
 may provide the basis for disqualification of that member or the denial of the application. The commission shall adopt regulations to implement this subdivision.

(e) For the purposes of this subdivision, “ex parte” means a communication without notice and opportunity for all parties to participate in the communication.

(f) Nothing in this section precludes a communication made on the record at a public hearing on a properly agendized matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 47.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

19873.

No license may be assigned or transferred either in whole or in part.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19859 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19874.

Subject to subdivision (b) of Section 19851, the commission shall issue and deliver to the applicant a license entitling the applicant to engage in the activity for which the license is issued, together with an enumeration of any specific terms and conditions of the license if both of the following conditions have been met:

(a) The commission is satisfied that the applicant is eligible and qualified to receive the license.

(b) All license fees required by statute and by regulations of the commission have been paid.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19860A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19875.

An owner’s gambling license shall be posted at all times in a conspicuous place in the area where gambling is conducted in the establishment for which the license is issued until it is replaced by a succeeding license.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19861 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19876.

(a) Subject to the power of the commission to deny, revoke, suspend, condition, or limit a license, as provided in this chapter, a license shall be valid for a period of two years from the date of issuance.

(b) An application for renewal of a gambling license shall be filed by the owner-licensee or key employee with the department no later than 120 calendar days prior to the expiration of the current license. The commission shall act upon an application for renewal prior to the date of expiration of
 the current license. Upon renewal of an owner license, the commission shall issue an appropriate renewal certificate or validating device or sticker.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if an applicant has submitted an application for renewal prior to the original expiration date of the current license and the commission is unable to act on the application prior to the expiration date, the commission may extend the current license for up to 180 days.

(d) In addition to the penalties provided by law, an owner-licensee who deals, operates, carries on, conducts, maintains, or exposes for
 play a gambling game after the expiration date of the gambling license is liable to the state for all license fees and penalties that would have been due upon renewal.

(e) If an owner-licensee fails to renew the gambling license as provided in this chapter, the commission may order the immediate closure of the premises and a cessation of all gambling activity within the premises until the license is renewed.

(f) If an owner-licensee
 applicant submits an application for
 renewal of the gambling license after the deadline described in subdivision (b) but before the original expiration date of the license, the commission may assess reasonable delinquency fees not to exceed three times the usual application fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 302, Sec. 5.   (AB 1271)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19876.5.

If an applicant has submitted an application for renewal prior to the original expiration date of a work permit or finding of suitability and the commission is unable to act on the application prior to the expiration date, the commission may extend the current work permit or finding of suitability for up to 180 days. The commission may adopt regulations to provide for the extension of other approvals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 553, Sec. 3.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19877.

The failure of an owner licensee to file an application for renewal before the date specified in this chapter may be deemed a surrender of the license. A license has not been renewed within the meaning of this section until all required renewal fees have been paid.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19862.5 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19878.

(a) Neither an owner licensee, nor a California affiliate of an owner licensee, shall enter into, without prior approval of the commission, any contract or agreement with a person who is denied a license, or whose license is suspended or revoked by the commission, or with any business enterprise under the control of that person, after the date of receipt of notice of the commission’s action.

(b) An owner licensee or an affiliate of the owner licensee shall not employ, without prior approval of the commission, any person in any capacity for which
 that person would be required to be licensed, if the person has been denied a license, or if their license has been suspended or revoked after the date of receipt of notice of the action by the commission. Neither an owner licensee, nor a California affiliate of an owner licensee, without prior approval of the commission, shall enter into any contract or agreement with a person whose application has been withdrawn with prejudice, or with any business enterprise under the control of that person, for the period of time during which the person is prohibited from filing a new application for licensure.

(c) (1) If an employee who is required to be licensed pursuant to this chapter fails to
 apply for a license within the time specified by regulation, is denied a license, or has their license revoked by the commission, the employee shall be terminated in any capacity in which they are required to be licensed and they shall not be permitted to exercise a significant influence over the gambling operation, or any part thereof, upon being notified of that action.

(2) If an employee who is required to be licensed pursuant to this chapter has their license suspended, the employee shall be suspended in any capacity in which they are required to be licensed and shall not be permitted to exercise a significant influence over the gambling operation, or any part thereof, during the period of suspension, upon being notified of that action.

(3) If the owner licensee designates another employee to replace the employee whose employment was terminated,
 the owner licensee shall promptly notify the department and shall require the newly designated employee to apply for a license.

(d) An owner licensee or an affiliate of the owner licensee shall not pay to a person whose employment has been terminated pursuant to subdivision (c) any remuneration for any service performed in any capacity in which the person is required to be licensed except for amounts due for services rendered before the date of receipt of notice of the commission’s action. Neither an owner licensee, nor an affiliate thereof, during the period of suspension, shall pay to a person whose employment has been suspended pursuant to subdivision (c), any remuneration for any service performed in any capacity in which the person is required to be licensed, except for amounts due for services rendered before the date of receipt of notice of the commission’s action.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a contract or agreement for the provision of services or property to an owner licensee or an affiliate thereof, or for the conduct of any activity at a gambling establishment, which is to be performed by a person required by this chapter or by regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, to be licensed, shall be terminated upon a suspension or revocation of the person’s license.

(f) In any case in which a contract or agreement for the provision of services or property to an owner licensee or an affiliate thereof, or for the conduct of any activity at a gambling establishment, is to be performed by a person required by this chapter or by regulations adopted by the commission to be licensed, the contract shall be deemed to include a provision for its termination without liability on the part of the owner licensee or its duly registered holding company upon a suspension or revocation of the
 person’s license. In any action brought by the department or commission to terminate a contract pursuant to subdivision (c) or (e), it shall not be a defense that the agreement does not expressly include the provision described in this subdivision, and the lack of express inclusion of the provision in the agreement shall not be a basis for enforcement of the contract by a party thereto.

(g) (1) The commission may, at its discretion, not apply the provisions of subdivision (a), (b), or (d), or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) when the person who has been denied a license was denied that license solely due to the person’s failure to clearly establish eligibility and qualification for licensure as described in subdivision (a) of Section 19859.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if additional grounds for denial of the license existed, whether or not those grounds were formally provided as the reason for the denial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 138, Sec. 2.   (SB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19879.

With regard to a person who has had their application for a license denied by the commission, all of the following shall apply:

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the person shall not be entitled to profit from any investment in any business entity that has applied for or been granted a state license.

(b) The person shall not retain any interest in a business entity described in subdivision (a) beyond that period prescribed by the commission.

(c) The person shall not accept more for their interest in a business entity described in subdivision (a) than they paid for it, or the market
 value on the date of the denial of the license or registration, whichever is higher.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed as a restriction or limitation on the powers of the commission specified in this chapter.

(e) (1) The commission may, at its discretion, not apply the provisions of this section when the person who has been denied a license was denied that license solely due to the person’s failure to clearly establish eligibility and qualification for licensure as described in subdivision (a) of Section 19859.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if additional grounds for denial of the license
 existed, whether or not those grounds were formally provided as the reason for the denial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 138, Sec. 3.   (SB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Licensing of Corporations [19880. - 19883.]

19880.

In addition to the requirements of Section 19852, in order to be eligible to receive a gambling license as the owner of a gambling enterprise, a corporation shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(a) Maintain an office of the corporation in the gambling establishment.

(b) Comply with all of the requirements of the laws of this state pertaining to corporations.

(c) Maintain, in the corporation’s principal office in California or in the gambling establishment, a ledger that meets both of the following conditions:

(1) At all times reflects the
 ownership of record of every class of security issued by the corporation.

(2) Is available for inspection by the department at all reasonable times without notice.

(d) Supply supplemental forms and information, in accordance with Section 19865, with the initial license application, and thereafter only on request, to the department, which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The organization, financial structure, and nature of the business to be operated, including the names, personal and criminal history, and fingerprints of all officers and directors, and the names, addresses, and number of shares held by all stockholders of record.

(2) The rights and privileges acquired by the
 holders of different classes of authorized securities, including debentures.

(3) The terms on which securities are to be offered.

(4) The terms and conditions on all outstanding loans, mortgages, trust deeds, pledges, or any other indebtedness or security interest.

(5) The extent of the equity security holdings in the corporation of all officers, directors, and underwriters, and their remuneration as compensation for services, in the form of salary, wages, fees, or otherwise.

(6) The amount of remuneration to persons other than directors and officers in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per annum.

(7) Bonus and profit-sharing arrangements.

(8) Management, consultant, and service contracts related to the operation of controlled gaming.

(9) Options existing, or to be created, in respect of their securities or other interests.

(10) Financial statements for at least three fiscal years preceding the year of registration, or, if the corporation has not been in existence for a period of three years, financial statements from the date of its formation. All financial statements shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and audited by a licensee of the California Board of Accountancy.

(11) Any further financial data that the department, with the approval of the commission, may deem necessary or appropriate for the protection of the state.

(12) An annual profit-and-loss statement and an annual balance sheet, and a copy of its annual federal income tax return, within 30 calendar days after that return is filed with the Internal Revenue Service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 233, Sec. 9.   (AB 293)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

19881.

(a) A corporation is not eligible to receive a license to own a gambling enterprise unless the conduct of controlled gambling is among the purposes stated in its articles of incorporation and the articles of incorporation have been submitted to and approved by the department.

(b) The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any articles of incorporation of any corporation that include as a stated purpose the conduct of controlled gambling, or any amendment thereto, or any amendment that adds this purpose to articles of incorporation already filed, unless the articles have, or amendment has, been approved by the
 department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 48.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

19882.

(a) If at any time the commission denies a license to, or revokes the license of, an individual owner of any security issued by a corporation that applies for or holds an owner license, both of the following shall apply:

 (1) The commission shall immediately notify the individual and the corporation of that fact.

(2) The owner of the security shall sell the security for an amount not greater than fair market value, within 60 calendar days of the denial or revocation. Upon a showing of due diligence, the commission may extend the time for selling the security.

(b) Beginning upon the date when the commission serves notice of the denial upon the corporation, it is unlawful for the denied security owner to do any of the following:

(1) Receive any dividend, income, or interest upon any security described in subdivision (a), except dividends equal to the good faith estimate of the owner’s personal share of any income tax due on the ownership interest until the date of the sale, as determined in writing by an independent
 certified public accountant, or as may be necessary to protect the election of the gambling enterprise to be treated as an “S corporation” under Subchapter S (commencing with Section 1361) of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) Exercise, directly or through any trustee or nominee, any voting right conferred by any security described in subdivision (a).

(3) Receive any remuneration in any form from the corporation for services rendered or for any other purpose.

(c) Every security issued by a corporate owner licensee shall bear a statement, on both sides of the certificate evidencing the security, of the restrictions imposed by this section.

(d) (1) The commission may, at its discretion, not apply the provisions of subdivision (b) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) when the person who has been denied a license was denied that license solely due to the person’s failure to clearly establish eligibility and qualification for licensure as described in subdivision (a) of Section 19859.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if additional grounds for denial of the license existed, whether or not those grounds were formally provided as the reason for the denial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 138, Sec. 4.   (SB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19883.

(a) To the extent required by this chapter, officers and directors, shareholders, lenders, holders of evidence of indebtedness, underwriters, agents, or employees of a corporate owner licensee shall be licensed individually. The corporation shall require these persons to apply for a gambling license, and shall notify the department of every change of corporate officers, directors, or key employees within 10 business days after the change. An officer, director, or key employee who is required to apply for a license shall apply for the license within 30 calendar days after he or she becomes an officer, director, or key employee.

(b) The corporation shall immediately remove any officer or director required to apply for a license from any office or directorship if any of the following apply to that officer or director:

(1) He or she fails to apply for the license within 30 calendar days after becoming an officer or director.

(2) He or she is denied a license.

(3) His or her license is revoked.

(c) If the license of any officer or director is suspended, the corporation, immediately and for the duration of the suspension, shall suspend that officer or director.

(d) If any shareholder who is required to apply for a gambling license fails to apply for the license within the time required, the shareholder shall be deemed to have been denied a license for purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 19882.

(e) If any person, other than an officer, director, or shareholder, who is required to apply for a gambling license fails to do so, the failure may be deemed to be a failure of the corporate owner licensee to require the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 31.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Licensing of Partnerships and Limited Liability Companies [19890. - 19893.]

19890.

In addition to the requirements of Section 19852, in order to be eligible to receive a gambling license to own a gambling enterprise, a partnership shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(a) Be registered as may be required under the laws of this state.

(b) Maintain an office of the partnership in the gambling establishment.

(c) Comply with all of the requirements of the laws of this state pertaining to partnerships.

(d) Maintain an ongoing ledger in an office of the partnership in California that shall meet both of the following
 conditions:

(1) At all times reflects the ownership of all interests in the partnership.

(2) Be available for inspection by the department at all reasonable times without notice.

(e) Supply the following supplemental forms and information in accordance with Section 19865 with the initial license application, and thereafter upon request, to the department, which shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) The organization, financial structure, and nature of the business to be operated, including the name, address, personal history, interest, and fingerprints of each partner and manager.

(2) The rights, privileges, and relative priorities of any partners as to the return of contributions to
 capital, and the right to receive income, accept losses, and incur liabilities.

(3) The terms on which partnership interests are to be offered.

(4) The terms and conditions on all outstanding loans, mortgages, trust deeds, pledges, or any other indebtedness or security interest.

(5) The extent of the holding in the partnership of all underwriters, and their remuneration as compensation for services, in the form of salary, wages, fees, or otherwise.

(6) The remuneration to persons other than general partners in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per annum.

(7) Bonus and profit-sharing arrangements.

(8) Management, consulting, and service contracts related to the operation of controlled gambling.

(9) Options existing or to be created.

(10) Financial statements for at least three fiscal years preceding the year of registration, or, if the partnership has not been in existence for a period of three years, financial statements from the date of its formation. All financial statements shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and audited by a licensee of the California Board of Accountancy in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards.

(11) Any further financial data that the department reasonably deems necessary or appropriate for the protection of the state.

(12) An annual profit-and-loss
 statement, an annual balance sheet, and a copy of its annual federal income tax return, within 30 calendar days after the return is filed with the Internal Revenue Service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 233, Sec. 12.   (AB 293)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

19890.5.

In addition to the requirements of Section 19852, in order to be eligible to receive a gambling license to own a gambling enterprise, a limited liability company shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(a) Be registered to do business in California.

(b) Maintain an office in the gambling establishment.

(c) Comply with all of the requirements of the laws of this state pertaining to a limited liability company.

(d) Maintain an ongoing ledger in an office of the limited liability company in California that shall meet both of the following conditions:

(1) At all times reflect the ownership, membership, and management interests.

(2) Be available for inspection by the department at all reasonable times without notice.

(e) Supply the following supplemental forms and information in accordance with Section 19865 with the initial application, and thereafter upon request to the department, which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The organization, financial structure, and nature of the business to be operated, including the names, personal and criminal history, and fingerprints of all members and managers, and the name, address, and interest of each owner, member, and manager.

(2) The rights, privileges, and relative
 priorities of members as to the return of contributions to capital, and the right to receive income, accept losses, and incur liabilities.

(3) The terms on which membership interests are to be offered.

(4) The terms and conditions on all outstanding loans, mortgages, trust deeds, pledges, or any other indebtedness or security interest.

(5) The extent of the holding in the limited liability company of all underwriters, and their remuneration as compensation for services, in the form of salary, wages, fees, or otherwise.

(6) The remuneration to persons other than managers or members in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per annum.

(7) Bonus and profit-sharing arrangements.

(8) Management, consulting, and service contracts related to the operation of controlled gambling.

(9) Options existing or to be created.

(10) Financial statements for at least three fiscal years preceding the year of application, or, if the limited liability company has not been in existence for a period of three years, financial statements from the date of its formation. All financial statements shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and audited by a licensee of the California Board of Accountancy in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards.

(11) Any further financial data that the department reasonably deems necessary or appropriate for the protection of the state.

(12) An annual profit-and-loss statement, an annual balance sheet, and a copy of its annual federal income tax return, within 30 calendar days after the return is filed with the Internal Revenue Service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 233, Sec. 13.   (AB 293)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

19891.

No limited partnership is eligible to receive a license to own a gambling enterprise unless the conduct of gambling is among the purposes stated in the certificate of limited partnership.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19881 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19892.

(a) The purported sale, assignment, transfer, pledge, or other disposition of any interest in a partnership or limited liability company that holds a gambling license, or the grant of an option to purchase the interest, is void unless approved in advance by the commission.

(b) (1) If at any time the commission denies a license to, or revokes the license of, an individual owner of any interest described in subdivision (a), the commission shall immediately notify the individual and the partnership or limited liability company of that fact.

 (2) The individual denied a license, or whose license is revoked, shall sell their interest in an amount not greater than fair market value, within 60 calendar days of the denial or revocation. Upon a showing of due diligence, the commission may extend the time for selling the security.

(c) Beginning upon the date when the commission serves a notice of denial upon the partnership or limited liability company, it is unlawful for the denied owner of the interest to do any of the following:

(1) Receive any share of
 the revenue or interest upon the partnership or limited liability company interest, except distributions equal to the good faith estimate of the owner’s personal share of any income tax due on the ownership interest until the date of the sale as determined in writing by an independent certified public accountant.

(2) Exercise, directly or through any trustee or nominee, any voting right conferred by that interest.

(3) Receive any remuneration in any form from the partnership, for services rendered or for any other purpose.

(d) Every certificate of limited partnership of any limited partnership or limited liability company holding a gambling license shall contain a statement of the restrictions imposed by this section.

(e) (1) The commission may, at its discretion, not apply the provisions of subdivision (c) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) when the person who has been denied a license was denied that license solely due to the person’s failure to clearly establish eligibility and qualification for licensure as described in subdivision (a) of Section 19859.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if additional grounds for denial of the license existed, whether or not those grounds were formally provided as the reason for the denial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 138, Sec. 5.   (SB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19893.

To the extent required by this chapter, general partners, limited partners, lenders, members, managers, holders of evidence of indebtedness, underwriters, agents, or employees of a partnership or limited liability company that holds or applies for a license to own a gambling enterprise shall be licensed individually. The partnership or limited liability company shall require these persons to apply for and obtain a gambling license. A person who is required to be licensed by this section as a partner, manager, or member shall not hold that position until he or she secures the required approval of, or a temporary license issued by, the commission. A person who is required to be licensed pursuant to a decision of the commission shall apply for a license within 30 days after the commission requests him or her to do
 so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 233, Sec. 15.   (AB 293)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Restrictions on Certain Transactions [19900. - 19906.]

19900.

(a) Except as may be provided by regulation of the commission, the following security interests shall not be enforced without the prior approval of the commission and compliance with regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (b):

(1) In a security issued by a corporation that is a holder of a gambling license in this state.

(2) In a security issued by a holding company that is not a publicly traded corporation.

(3) In a security issued by a partnership, limited partnership, or limited liability company that is a holder of a gambling license in this state.

(b) The commission shall adopt regulations establishing the procedure for the enforcement of a security interest. Any remedy provided by the regulations for the enforcement of the security interest is in addition to any other remedy provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 233, Sec. 16.   (AB 293)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

19901.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, purchase, lease, hypothecate, borrow or loan money, or create a voting trust agreement or any other agreement of any sort to, or with, any licensee in connection with any controlled gambling operation licensed under this chapter or with respect to any portion of the gambling operation, except in accordance with the regulations of the commission.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19901A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19902.

When any person contracts to sell or lease any property or interest in property, real or personal, under circumstances that require the approval or licensing of the purchaser or lessee by the commission pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19853, the contract shall not specify a closing date for the transaction that is prior to that approval or licensing by the commission. Any provision of a contract that specifies an earlier closing date is void for all purposes, but the invalidity does not affect the validity of any other provision of the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   (AB 156)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19903.

When any person contracts to sell or lease any property or interest in property, real or personal, under circumstances that require the approval or licensing of the purchaser or lessee by the commission pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19853, the contract shall contain a provision satisfactory to the commission regarding responsibility for the payment of any fees due pursuant to any subsequent deficiency determinations made under this chapter that shall encompass any period of time before the closing date of the transaction.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19903A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 76.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19904.

The purported sale, assignment, transfer, pledge, or other disposition of any security issued by a corporation, membership interest of a limited liability company, or ownership interest of a partnership or sole proprietor that holds a gambling license, or the grant of an option to purchase that interest or security, is void unless approved in advance by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 302, Sec. 6.   (AB 1271)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19905.

Every owner licensee that is involved in a transaction for the extension or redemption of credit by the licensee, or for the payment, receipt, or transfer of coin, currency, or other monetary instruments, as specified by the commission, in an amount, denomination, or amount and denomination, or under circumstances prescribed by regulations, and any other participant in the transaction, as specified by the commission, shall, if required by regulation, make and retain a record of, or file with the department a report on, the transaction, at the time and in the manner prescribed by regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 34.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19906.

(a) A contract for the sale of a gambling enterprise shall state whether any outstanding gaming chips from the seller will be honored by the purchaser. If the contract does not require the purchaser to honor the outstanding gaming chips used by the seller, then the contract shall indicate what provisions have been made for the redemption of outstanding gaming chips as of the closing date of the sale.

(b) Prior to any action of the commission on the proposed contract for sale of the gambling enterprise, the department shall determine the amount of the seller’s outstanding gaming chip liability. The seller shall satisfy the commission that the amount of liability is safeguarded by a surety bond, escrow
 account, or other form of security sufficient to guarantee the availability of funds for the redemption of outstanding gaming chips. The seller shall give notice to the patrons of the gambling enterprise in order to provide an adequate opportunity for redemption of any outstanding gaming chips.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 391, Sec. 2.   (AB 156)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Work Permits [19910. - 19915.]

19910.

The Legislature finds that to protect and promote the health, safety, good order, and general welfare of the inhabitants of this state, and to carry out the policy declared by this chapter, it is necessary that the department ascertain and keep itself informed of the identity, prior activities, and present location of all gambling enterprise employees and independent agents in the State of California, and when appropriate to do so, recommend to the commission for approval persons for employment in gambling establishments as provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 35.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19911.

(a) A person under 21 years of age is not eligible for a work permit, and a permit shall not be issued to a person under 21 years of age.

(b) A person who is 18
 through 20 years of age may be employed to work in a gambling establishment, without a work permit, but shall not be allowed to perform any duties of a gambling enterprise employee on the floor of the gambling
 establishment or in areas that are identified as restricted access areas to gambling enterprise employees, including, but not limited to, the cage, count room, surveillance room, security office, vault, and card storage. A person who is 18 through 20 years of age may be employed in job classifications that entail providing services
 exclusively off the gaming floor and that are not involved in the play of a controlled game.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 432, Sec. 2.   (AB 649)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

19912.

(a) (1) A person shall not be employed as a gambling enterprise employee, or serve as an independent agent, except as provided in paragraph (2), (3), or (4), unless the person is the holder of one of the following:

(A) A valid work permit issued in accordance with the applicable ordinance or regulations of the county, city, or city and county in which the person’s duties are performed.

(B) A work permit issued by the commission pursuant to regulations adopted by the commission for the issuance and renewal of work permits. A work permit issued by the commission shall be valid for two years. A work permit,
 once issued by the commission, shall authorize a person to act as a gambling enterprise employee, or serve as an independent agent, until the expiration or revocation of that work permit and shall entitle the holder to work for any gambling enterprise for which the commission issues work permits as a gambling enterprise employee after proper notification to the department.

(2) An independent agent is not required to hold a work permit if the independent agent is not a resident of this state and has registered with the department in accordance with regulations.

(3) A person whose job duties are not supervisory, not related to the operation or administration of gambling, and who does not perform employment duties in the area where gambling is conducted, may begin working as a
 gambling enterprise employee after applying for a work permit provided that the person wears a temporary badge on their outermost garment at chest level with their name, picture, and the words “Non-Gaming Employee, Work Permit Pending.” Except as provided in paragraph (4), after the person has received a work permit, the person may perform any duties for which a work permit is required. If the person is denied a work permit, the person shall not work as a gambling enterprise employee in any gaming or nongaming job.
